Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-213
Licensed organization, defined.

Licensed organization shall mean a nonprofit organization or volunteer fire company or volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance, or emergency squad licensed to conduct bingo under the Nebraska Bingo Act.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 10;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-133;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 5.